California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(1) A survivor of gender-based violence who formerly experienced homelessness.

(2) Representatives of local agencies or organizations that participate in the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development’s Continuum of Care Program.

(3) Stakeholders with expertise in solutions to homelessness and best practices from other states.

(4) Representatives of
 committees on African Americans, youth, and survivors of gender-based violence.

(5) A currently or formerly homeless person who lives in California.

(6) A currently or formerly homeless youth who lives in California.

(7) A currently or formerly homeless person with a developmental disability.

(8) This advisory committee shall designate one of the above-described members to participate in every quarterly executive council meeting to provide a report to the executive council on advisory committee activities.

(e) Within existing funding, the executive council and council staff may establish working groups, task forces, or other structures from within its membership or with outside members to assist it in its work. Council staff may establish working groups, task forces, or other structures to assist in its work. Working groups, task forces, or other structures established by the executive council or council staff shall
 determine their own meeting schedules.

(f) Upon request of the executive council or council staff, a state agency or department that administers one or more state homelessness programs, including, but not limited to, an agency or department represented on the executive council pursuant to subdivision (c), the agency or department shall be required to do both of the following:

(1) Participate in executive council or council staff, as applicable, workgroups, task forces, or other similar administrative structures.

(2) Provide to the executive council or council staff, as applicable, any relevant information regarding those state homelessness programs.

(g) (1) The members of the executive council, advisory committee, or working groups who are or have been homeless may receive per diem and reimbursement for travel or other expenses as follows:

(A) A member of the executive council who
 is or has been homeless shall receive a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day during which that member is engaged in the performance of official duties and shall also be reimbursed for travel and other expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of official duties.

(B) A member of the advisory committee who is or has been homeless shall receive a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day during which that member is engaged in the performance of official duties and shall also be reimbursed for travel and other expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of official duties.

(C) A member of a working group, as defined and managed by the executive council or
 council staff, who is or has been homeless shall receive a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day during which that member is engaged in the performance of official duties and shall also be reimbursed for travel and other expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of official duties.

(2) (A) A per diem or reimbursement request pursuant to paragraph (1) is subject to funding availability.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, assistance provided pursuant to this subdivision shall not be deemed to be income for purposes of the Personal Income Tax Law (Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code) or used to determine eligibility for any state program or local program financed wholly or in part by state funds.

(3) (A) For purposes of complying with paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 41 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as it pertains to this subdivision, the Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(i) The specific goals, purposes, and objectives that the exemptions created by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) are as follows:

(I) The objective is to facilitate the participation of individuals with lived homelessness experience in order to include valuable insight from those lived experiences in shaping policy recommendations.

(II) The goal is to prevent members with lived homelessness experience from incurring tax liability because of their participation.

(III) The purpose is to enable participants with
 lived homelessness experience to receive the full benefit of their per diem and reimbursements.

(ii) The performance indicators the Legislature can use to determine if the exemption is achieving the goals, purposes, and objectives stated in clause (i) shall be as follows:

(I) Whether the executive council, advisory committee, or working group members with lived homelessness experience incur any tax liability because of their participation on the committee.

(II) The number of people with lived homelessness experience who serve on the executive council, advisory committee, and working groups.

(B) (i) For purposes of complying with paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 41 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as it pertains to this subdivision, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall deliver to the Legislature on or before April 1 of each year a written report that includes both of the following:

(I) The estimated aggregate tax liability incurred by executive council, advisory committee, or working group members with lived homelessness experience because of their participation on the committee.

(II) The estimated number of people with lived homelessness experience who serve on the executive
 council, advisory committee, or working groups that excluded qualified amounts from gross income as described in paragraph (1).

(ii) A report submitted pursuant to this subparagraph shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(iii) The reporting requirement pursuant to this subparagraph shall become inoperative on April 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “the performance of official duties” includes, but is not limited to, attending an executive council, advisory, or working group meeting and reviewing agenda materials for no more than one day in preparation for each executive council, advisory, or working group meeting.

(h) The appointed members of the executive council or committees, as described in this section, shall serve at the pleasure of their appointing authority.

(i) The members of the executive council may enter into memoranda of understanding with other members of the executive council to achieve the goals set forth in this chapter, as necessary, in order to facilitate communication and cooperation between the entities the members of the executive council represent.

(j) There shall be an executive officer of the council.

(k) The council staff shall be under the direction of the executive officer.

(l) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 68, Sec. 44.   (AB 179)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8257.01.

(a) The executive council shall leverage the programmatic and administrative expertise of relevant state departments and agencies.

(b) The executive council may also designate and reimburse a state agency or department to administer programs and related functions as it considers necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 109.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8257.02.

(a) The California Interagency Council on Homelessness shall be administered by an executive officer of the California Interagency Council on Homelessness.

(b) The executive council may delegate authority to the executive officer to act in the name of the executive council between meetings of the executive council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 110.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8257.03.

The provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11150) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code apply to the council, and the executive officer is the head of the California Interagency Council on Homelessness within the meaning of those provisions. The executive officer shall perform all duties, exercise all powers, discharge all responsibility, and administer and enforce all laws, rules, and regulations under the jurisdiction of the council. The executive officer shall keep all books and records necessary for proper and efficient administration of the California Interagency Council on Homelessness.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 111.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8257.04.

The executive officer may employ employees that the executive officer may need to discharge, in a proper manner, the duties imposed upon them by law. The executive officer shall prescribe their duties and fix their compensation in accordance with classifications made by the State Personnel Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 112.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8257.05.

For the purposes of this chapter, the California Interagency Council on Homelessness has all of the following powers:

(a) To sue and be sued in its own name.

(b) To have an official seal and to alter it at its pleasure.

(c) To make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary or convenient for the exercise of its powers and functions.

(d) To provide advice, technical information, and consultative and technical services as provided in this chapter.

(e) To enter into agreements or other
 transactions with any governmental agency.

(f) To appear on its own behalf before boards, commissions, departments, or other agencies of local, state, or federal government.

(g) To establish any regional offices necessary to effectuate the council’s purposes and functions.

(h) To provide bilingual staff in connection with services of the council and make available council publications in a language other than English when necessary to effectively serve groups for which the services or publications are made available.

(i) To do any and all things necessary to carry out its purposes and exercise the powers expressly granted by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 113.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8257.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to obtain trustworthy information to connect funding allocated to prevent and end homelessness with established sheltering and housing resources and to provide state agencies with accurate information to allow for more accurate forecasting to target future investments. To advance these goals, the council shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, do both of the following:

(1) Conduct, or contract with an entity to conduct, a statewide homelessness assessment that will do all of the following:

(A) Identify all programs a state agency funds, implements, or administers for the purpose of providing unsheltered outreach services, emergency shelter, housing or housing-based services to persons experiencing homelessness or at risk of homelessness and do all of the following:

(i) Identify homelessness interventions and service categories available statewide and in geographically diverse regions across the state.

(ii) Compile the amount of
 funding distributed to local jurisdictions and its stated intent by the administering entity.

(iii) Identify the intended uses for the funds identified pursuant to clause (ii) by type of intervention as stated by local jurisdictions requesting funding made available for housing- or homelessness-related services.

(iv) Identify conditions or premise of the funds identified pursuant to clause (ii) as it relates to leveraging nonstate dollars.

(v) If applicable, reasons for the unavailability of data.

(B) Obtain the following information for each program identified in subparagraph (A) to the extent that data is available in local Homeless Management Information Systems (HMIS), the Homeless Data Integration System (HDIS) or other readily available data
 sources:

(i) The number of permanent housing units that the program made available.

(ii) The amount of rental subsides, vouchers, or other forms of financial support intended to prevent homelessness or to rehouse individuals that the program made available.

(iii) The number of emergency shelter beds, vouchers, or units that the program made available.

(iv) The wrap around services that the program offered.

(C) Collect data, to the extent data it is available, on the numbers and demographics of persons served through the identified services, including, but not limited to, a quantification of the disparities across age, race, ethnicity, and other demographics based on the following
 subpopulation categories to describe the homelessness population relative to the general population:

(i) Young adults.

(ii) Unaccompanied minors.

(iii) Single adults experiencing either chronic or nonchronic patterns of homelessness, of first-time homelessness.

(iv) Adults over 50 years of age.

(v) Veterans.

(vi) Families experiencing either chronic or nonchronic patterns of homelessness, or first-time homelessness.

(D) For each program identified pursuant to subparagraph (A) that provides housing or homelessness-related services, collect and analyze the
 following data:

(i) The number of persons served annually by service or intervention type by age, gender, and racial subgroupings.

(ii) Typical service mix use to develop portrait of the “types” of system clients to better understand the holistic needs of people experiencing homelessness and to forecast future uses and policies of resources intended to address homelessness.

(iii) The service, services, or service mixes that are associated with individuals exiting homelessness.

(iv) The duration and frequency individuals accessed services, on average, and the length of time from program intake to the date the individual moves into permanent housing or resolves homelessness.

(v) Each type of
 housing and each type of intervention provided disaggregated by age, racial, and gender characteristics of recipients.

(vi) The number of individuals whose homelessness was prevented after accessing homelessness prevention services

(vii) Information about the people who accessed the resources identified in subparagraph (B) and disaggregated by demographic characteristics described in subparagraph (C).

(viii) Analyze the results of current permanent and interim housing programs by program type.

(ix) Additional data necessary to provide a comprehensive view of the homelessness response system.

(E) Provide the reasons for lack of data availability, if applicable.

(2) (A) For purposes of collecting data to conduct the assessment pursuant to paragraph (1), evaluate available data, including, but not limited to, HDIS, data from state agencies administering homelessness funds, statewide and local homeless point-in-time counts and housing inventory counts, and available statewide information on the number or rate of persons exiting state-funded institutional settings, including, but not limited to, state prisons and, to the extent possible, local jails, into homelessness.

(B) The council staff may work with a technical assistance provider from the federal Department of Housing and Urban Development to complete the assessment.

(C) For purposes of collecting data pursuant to paragraph (1), a local government may collaborate with the council staff or the entity conducting the statewide assessment to, if available, share existing data from existing local analyses of system needs or gaps to complement other data requested.

(D) The council staff shall submit an interim report by July 1, 2022, to the Assembly Housing and Community Development Committee, the Assembly Committee on Budget, Senate Committee on Housing, and Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review. The report submitted pursuant to this paragraph shall comply with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(E) The council shall report on the final assessment by December 31, 2022, to the Assembly Housing and Community Development Committee, the Assembly Committee on Budget, Senate Committee on Housing, and Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review. The report submitted pursuant to this paragraph shall comply with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(b) For purposes of this
 section, all of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Chronic homelessness” has the same definition as that in Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that section read on January 1, 2020.

(2) “State-funded institutional settings” include, but are not limited to, justice, juvenile justice, child welfare, and health care settings.

(3) “Young adult” means a person 18 to 24 years of age, inclusive.

(4) “Persons at risk of homelessness” means a person or family in the circumstances described in Section 11302(a)(5) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(5) “Homeless” has the same meaning as defined in Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as
 that section read on January 10, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 114.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8257.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of designing, collecting data for, and approving the assessment described in Section 8257.1, a state agency that has a member on the executive council shall, within 60 days of a request for data pertaining to that state agency, provide to the council staff, or the entity conducting the assessment, the requested data, including, but not limited to, the number or rate of persons exiting state-funded institutional settings into homelessness. State agencies shall be granted reasonable extensions beyond 60 days as necessary to produce high quality data. The state department or agency shall remove any personally identifying data provided pursuant to this subdivision, if any.

(b) The council staff shall provide the local data collected pursuant to Section 8257.1 to the respective administering state agencies overseeing those programs within 45 days of receipt.

(1) The council staff and the state agency receiving data pursuant to this subdivision shall work in collaboration to determine the format and timing of delivery of local data collected to comply with data security and privacy practices and availability of staff to execute requests.

(2) When feasible, the council staff shall notify the state agency receiving data pursuant to this subdivision at least seven days prior to sharing or publicly using or referencing the data, including, but not limited to, using the data for any substantive analysis summary statistics, or other findings.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Personally identifying information” has the same meaning as that in Section 1798.79.8 of the Civil Code.

(2) “State-funded institutional settings” include, but are not limited to, justice, juvenile justice, child welfare, and health care settings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 115.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8257.3.

(a) The council shall coordinate with representatives from LGBTQ+ communities, including, but not limited to, housing providers, nonprofit organizations, advocates, and researchers, to do all of the following:

(1) Identify recommended policies and best practices for providing inclusive and culturally competent services to LGBTQ+ people experiencing homelessness.

(2) Develop recommendations to do all of the following:

(A) Provide education, training, and resources to improve culturally competent services for LGBTQ+ people in state homelessness
 programs.

(B) Expand data collection to understand the needs and experiences of LGBTQ+ people in state homelessness programs.

(C) Prevent discrimination, harassment, and violence against members of the LGBTQ+ community in state homelessness programs.

(b) For purposes of this section, “state homelessness programs” means those programs that are funded, in whole or in part, by the state with the express purpose of addressing or preventing homelessness or providing services to people experiencing homelessness.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 9795 of the Government Code, on or before
 July 1, 2027, the council shall submit a report on the recommendations required by subdivision (a) to the Assembly Committee on Housing and Community Development and the Senate Committee on Housing, or their successor committees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 495, Sec. 1.   (AB 678)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Homeless Youth Act of 2018 [8259. - 8261.]

8259.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) Runaway and homeless youth are young people 12 to 24 years of age, inclusive, who have the least access to essential opportunities and supports.

(b) The prevalence of runaways and homelessness among youth is staggering. Studies suggest that between 1.6 and 2.8 million youth up to 24 years of age in the United States experience homelessness every year. A disproportionate number of young people experiencing homelessness are youth of color, gay, lesbian, bisexual, or transgender.

(c) California has the second highest rate of unsheltered young people experiencing homelessness in the nation,
 and the number is growing.

(d) Thirty-one percent of all young people experiencing homelessness in the United States live in California, yet two-thirds of the state’s counties lack basic services for young people experiencing homelessness, including shelter, mental and behavioral services, family maintenance and strengthening, and substance abuse treatment programs.

(e) Research indicates that young people experiencing homelessness are more likely to have used or to begin using drugs and alcohol due to their experiences of trauma and abuse prior to becoming homeless or as a result of homelessness, including commercial sexual exploitation.

(f) With the adoption by the voters of Proposition 64, the Adult Use of Marijuana Act, there is an opportunity for new funding to support various programs and services for young
 people experiencing homelessness, including those with substance use disorders.

(g) In furthering the goal to prevent youth homelessness, the Legislature has created the Homeless Youth Act of 2018 to improve prevention and early intervention support services, low barrier and diverse housing opportunities, and posthousing and followup services for young people experiencing homelessness, including those with substance use disorders.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 841, Sec. 3.   (SB 918)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8260.

The following definitions apply for purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Act” means the Homeless Youth Act of 2018 enacted by this chapter.

(b) “Continuum of care” has the same meaning as defined in Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) “Council” means the California Interagency Council on Homelessness, formerly known as the Homeless Coordinating and Financing Council as described in Section 8257.

(d) “Homeless youth” means an unaccompanied youth between 12 and 24 years of age, inclusive, who is
 experiencing homelessness, as defined in subsection (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)). “Homeless youth” includes unaccompanied youth who are pregnant or parenting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 398, Sec. 6.   (AB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

8261.

(a) The council shall set and measure progress towards goals to prevent and end homelessness among youth in California by doing both of the following:

(1) Setting specific, measurable goals aimed at preventing and ending homelessness among youth in the state. These goals shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Measurably decreasing the number of young people experiencing homelessness in the state.

(B) Measurably increasing permanency rates among young people experiencing homelessness by decreasing the
 length and occurrences of young people experiencing homelessness caused by a youth’s separation from family or a legal guardian.

(C) Decreasing the duration and frequency of experiences of homelessness among California’s youth.

(D) Decreasing barriers to services through promoting cross-systems partnerships to expedite access to services, including social services, child welfare services, regional center services, and mental health services.

(2) Defining outcome measures and gathering data related to the goals.

(A) The council shall develop and collect data on county-level and statewide measures, including, but not limited to, the number of young people experiencing homelessness in California and their dependency status, delinquency status, family
 reunification status, housing status, program participation, and runaway status.

(B) Data collection and sharing among state and county agencies and service providers shall be a condition upon the receipt of any state funding for programs related to youth homelessness and its prevention. All recipients shall be required to share with the council any relevant data from their Homeless Management Information Systems. Data collection and sharing pursuant to this chapter shall be conducted and maintained in accordance with all applicable state and federal privacy and confidentiality laws and regulations.

(C) The council shall seek data from any and all relevant sources, including the Homeless Management Information System (HMIS), if available, in order to meet the requirements of this section.

(D) Providers of data shall
 do either of the following:

(i) Redact the names, dates of birth, and addresses of victims of domestic violence, as defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code, prior to reporting data to the council.

(ii) Obtain informed consent from a victim of domestic violence, as defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code and in accordance with all applicable state and federal confidentiality laws, before disclosing confidential information about that individual pursuant to this section.

(b) In order to coordinate a spectrum of funding, policy, and practice efforts related to young people experiencing homelessness, the council shall do both of the following:

(1) Coordinate with young people experiencing homelessness, the State Department of Social Services, other
 appropriate state and county agencies and departments, and other stakeholders to inform policy, practices, and programs.

(2) To the extent that funding is made available, provide technical assistance and program development support to increase capacity among new and existing service providers to best meet statewide needs, particularly in areas where services for young people experiencing homelessness have not been established, and provide support to service providers in making evidence-informed and data-driven decisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 50, Sec. 18.   (AB 169)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Homeless Domestic Violence Survivors and Homelessness Data Systems [8262. - 8266.]

8262.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Research has found that women and men who experienced food and housing insecurity in the past 12 months reported a significantly higher 12-month prevalence of rape, physical violence, or stalking by an intimate partner compared to women and men who did not experience food and housing insecurity.

(b) In a California study, women who experienced interpersonal violence in the last year had almost four times the odds of reporting housing instability than women who did not experience interpersonal violence.

(c) Research indicates that upward of 57 percent of all homeless women report
 that domestic violence was the immediate cause of their homelessness. Additionally, 38 percent of all survivors of domestic violence become homeless at some point in their lives.

(d) A survivor of domestic violence will often leave the person causing harm multiple times before finally escaping the violence, therefore experiencing multiple periods of homelessness.

(e) The violence and experience of homelessness not only impacts the adult survivors of domestic violence, but also their children. Among mothers with children experiencing homelessness, more than 80 percent had previously experienced domestic violence.

(f) The state’s Homeless Data Integration System (HDIS) shows that in 2020, 33,686 Californians experiencing homelessness were victims of domestic violence, and that women, transgender, and gender
 nonconforming people were 43 percent of those experiencing homelessness.

(g) Unaccompanied women are individuals who identify as women, 18 years of age and older, who are experiencing homelessness while not in the company of children or other dependents.

(h) Unaccompanied women constitute 29 percent, or nearly one in three of all adult individuals experiencing homelessness in the United States, for a total of 120,015 women, constituting over one-half of all unhoused women nationally, according to Point-in-Time data summarized in the 2020 Annual Homeless Assessment Report (AHAR).

(i) California has the single largest population of women experiencing homelessness in the nation. According to HDIS, 102,112 women experienced homelessness in California in 2020. According to the 2020 AHAR, 53,505 women were experiencing
 homelessness as individuals in California. Unaccompanied women constitute one in three of all unhoused Californians, and 40 percent of individuals experiencing homelessness.

(j) Unaccompanied women endure high rates of first-time homelessness, longer spells of homelessness, and higher barriers in accessing stable housing. Unaccompanied women are disproportionately women of color, particularly Black women, and they report extremely high incidence of trauma, whether physical, sexual, or psychological in nature, that is compounded by their ongoing homelessness.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 665, Sec. 2.   (SB 914)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8263.

The following definitions apply for purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Continuum of care” has the same meaning as defined in Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) “Victim service provider” has the same meaning as defined in Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) “Unaccompanied woman” means an individual who identifies as a woman who is 18 years of age or older, who is experiencing homelessness, as defined in the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11302), and who is not accompanied by children or other dependents.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 665, Sec. 2.   (SB 914)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8264.

(a) Cities, counties, and continuums of care receiving state funding to address homelessness on or after January 1, 2024, shall include families, including women with children; people fleeing or attempting to flee domestic violence; and unaccompanied women within the vulnerable populations for whom specific system supports are developed to maintain homeless services and housing delivery.

(b) Cities, counties, and continuums of care receiving state
 funding to address homelessness on or after January 1, 2024, shall develop analyses and goals with victim service providers to address the specific needs of the population described in subdivision (a) with data measures not included within the Homeless Management Information System, in accordance with federal policies and all of the following guidelines:

(1) Any local landscape analysis that assesses the current number of people experiencing homelessness and existing programs that address homelessness within the jurisdiction shall incorporate aggregate data from victim service providers, along with any other data sources.

(2) The analyses and goals shall ensure the responses to family homelessness include victim service providers, as these organizations
 consistently provide shelter and housing responses to survivors and their children.

(3) The analyses and goals shall address the nexus of homelessness and justice-involvement, particularly for women and survivors of domestic violence.

(4) The analyses and goals shall disaggregate the number of beds provided by victim service providers in the city, county, or region served by a continuum of care.

(c) (1) Cities, counties, and continuums of care that develop analyses and goals pursuant to subdivision (b) shall provide that information to the Interagency Council on Homelessness.

(2) The Interagency Council on Homelessness shall post the information developed by cities, counties, and continuums of care pursuant to subdivision (b) on its internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 499, Sec. 1.   (AB 790)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8265.

For purposes of improving the quality and accuracy of data about the homeless population, both of the following shall apply:

(a) In accordance with federal policies, victim service providers shall not be expected or required to enter client-level data into the statewide Homeless Data Integration System or the Homeless Management Information System.

(b) Commencing January 1, 2024, funding provided to cities, counties, and continuums of care, consistent with authorized program uses and limitations, may be utilized to support the development and maintenance of comparable databases as described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 665, Sec. 2.   (SB 914)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8266.

(a) The Interagency Council on Homelessness shall set and measure progress toward goals to prevent and end homelessness among women with children, domestic violence survivors and their children, and unaccompanied women in California by doing all of the following:

(1) Setting specific, measurable goals aimed at preventing and ending homelessness among
 domestic violence survivors and their children and among unaccompanied women in the state. These goals shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) Measurably decreasing the number of domestic violence survivors and their children and of unaccompanied women experiencing homelessness in the state.

(B) Decreasing the duration and frequency of experiences of homelessness among domestic violence survivors and their children and among unaccompanied women.

(C) Decreasing barriers to services through promoting cross-systems partnerships to expedite access to services, including social services, domestic violence services, regional center services, housing services, and mental health services.

(2) Defining outcome measures and gathering data related
 to the goals.

(3) (A) When funding is available, providing technical assistance to cities, counties, and continuums of care to support the development of local programs and plans that address the needs of domestic violence survivors and their children and of unaccompanied women.

(B) In addition to subparagraph (A), working with the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development to provide technical assistance to cities, counties, and continuums of care in furtherance of this section.

(b) The Interagency Council on Homelessness shall establish initial goals, as described in subdivision (a), by January 1, 2025, and evaluate these goals at least every two years to determine whether updated
 goals are needed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 499, Sec. 2.   (AB 790)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 8.5. MELLO-GRANLUND OLDER CALIFORNIANS ACT [9000. - 9861.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [9000. - 9023.]

9000.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the Mello-Granlund Older Californians Act, that reflects the policy mandates and directives of the Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended, and sets forth the state’s commitment to older adults, people with disabilities, and family caregivers served by the programs administered by the California Department of Aging.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 1.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9001.

The Legislature hereby finds and recognizes all of the following:

(a) Older adults constitute a fundamental resource of the state that previously has been undervalued and poorly utilized, and ways must be found to enable older adults to apply their competence, wisdom, and experience for the benefit of all Californians.

(b) There is a continuing increase in the number of older adults in proportion to the total population.

(c) Services to older adults are administered by many different agencies and departments at both the state and local level.

(d) Enhanced
 coordination reduces duplication, eliminates inefficiencies, and enhances service delivery for the consumer.

(e) The ability of the constantly increasing number of older adults in the state to maintain self-sufficiency and personal well-being with the dignity to which their years of labor entitle them and to realize their maximum potential as creative and productive individuals are matters of profound importance and concern for all of the people of this state.

(f) In June 2019, Governor Gavin Newsom issued Executive Order No. N-14-19, calling for the creation of a Master Plan for Aging (MPA), which seeks to prepare local communities for the year 2030 when 10.8 million Californians—one in four residents—will be 60 years of age or older. The executive order affirms the priority of the health and well-being of older Californians and the need for policies that promote aging with
 dignity and independence.

(g) The state’s major demographic shift towards an older, more diverse population requires statewide systems and local structures that do all of the following:

(1) Offer, coordinate, and integrate increasingly complex social, medical, cognitive, and behavioral health supports.

(2) Respond to the needs of a growing number of older adults, people with disabilities, and family caregivers.

(3) Affirm the important values of race, ethnicity, language, culture, sexual orientation, and gender identity.

(h) In preparing for the aging of California’s population, the state seeks to eliminate disparities and improve access to services and supports to meet the needs of older
 adults, people with disabilities, and caregivers.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature to reform provisions of the Mello-Granlund Older Californians Act related to area agencies on aging with respect to all of the following:

(1) Geography and demographics.

(2) Governance, including area agency on aging designations and planning service area boundaries.

(3) Programs and services.

(4) Performance measures.

(5) Funding sources and capacities.

(6) Public awareness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 2.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9002.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:
